Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-707
Assistance; qualified recipients.

Organizations which may receive assistance under the Nebraska Affordable Housing Act are governmental subdivisions, local housing authorities, community action agencies, community-based or neighborhood-based or reservation-based nonprofit organizations, and for-profit entities working in conjunction with one of the other eligible organizations and shall be required to provide, or cause to be provided, matching funds for the eligible activity in an amount determined by the Department of Economic Development, which amount shall be at least equal to ten percent of the amount of assistance provided by the Affordable Housing Trust Fund. Nothing in the act shall be construed to allow individuals to receive direct loans from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund.

Laws 1996, LB 1322, § 17;

Laws 1997, LB 864, § 10.